District of Columbia statutes.
31-1357

Subordination of claims for noncooperation.

If an ancillary receiver in another state or foreign country, whether called by that name or not, fails to transfer to the domiciliary liquidator in the District any assets within his or her control other than special deposits, diminished only by the expenses of the ancillary receivership, if any, the claims filed in the ancillary receivership, other than special deposit claims or secured claims, shall be placed in the class of claims under § 31-1340(7).

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 58, 40 DCR 5773
1981 Ed., § 35-2857.